Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-147
Howard.

The county of Howard is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township thirteen, north, of range twelve, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township thirteen, north, of range nine, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township sixteen, north, of range nine, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township sixteen, north, of range twelve, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 28, p. 217;

R.S.1913, § 860;

C.S.1922, § 762;

C.S.1929, § 25-149;

R.S.1943, § 22-147.